District of Columbia statutes.
8-109.05

Supplemental EIS.

(a)

The Mayor, or a board, commission, authority, or person shall prepare a supplemental EIS if:

(1)

The agency or applicant makes or proposes a substantial change in the proposed action that is relevant to environmental concerns; or

(2)

There are significant new circumstances or information relevant to environmental concerns that affect the proposed action or the impact of the proposed action.

(b)

The supplemental EIS shall be prepared, transmitted, and funded in accordance with the requirements of § 8-109.03.

Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-36, § 6, 36 DCR 5741
1981 Ed., § 6-985.